Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-925
Employee; action against; when.

Nothing in the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act and sections 16-727, 16-728, 23-175, 39-809, and 79-610 shall be construed to prevent a political subdivision from bringing an action for recovery from an employee of the political subdivision when the political subdivision has made payment of an award or settlement growing out of the employee's act or omission under such act and sections.

Laws 1969, c. 138, § 19, p. 634;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2419;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1033.